Washington statutes.
RCW 18.46.040

License—Issuance—Renewal—Limitations—Display.

Upon receipt of an application for a license and the license fee, the licensing agency shall issue a license if the applicant and the birthing center meet the requirements established under this chapter. A license, unless suspended or revoked, shall be renewable annually. Applications for renewal shall be on forms provided by the department and shall be filed in the department not less than ten days prior to its expiration. Each application for renewal shall be accompanied by a license fee as established by the department under RCW 43.20B.110. Each license shall be issued only for the premises and persons named in the application and shall not be transferable or assignable except with the written approval of the department. Licenses shall be posted in a conspicuous place on the licensed premises.

[ 2000 c 93 s 32; 1987 c 75 s 5; 1982 c 201 s 6; 1951 c 168 s 5. Prior: 1943 c 214 s 3; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6130-49.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 75: See RCW 43.20B.900.